Utah statutes.
56-1-32.   Judicial review.

(1)  Any party aggrieved by any order of the commission may obtain judicial review.

(2)  Venue for judicial review of informal adjudicative proceedings is in the district court of the county in which the place of employment is located.



Amended by Chapter 161, 1987 General Session

